Utah statutes.
73-2-17.   Authorization of cooperative investigations of groundwater
resources.
The state engineer, for and on behalf of the state of Utah, with the approval
of the executive director and the governor, is authorized and directed to
enter into an agreement with the United States geological survey or any other
federal or state agency, for cooperation in making investigations of the
groundwater resources of the state and reporting thereon.
